Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Administrative Dissolution

271B.14-200.
Grounds for administrative dissolution. [Repealed.]

271B.14-210.
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution. [Repealed.]

271B.14-220.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution or revocation under prior law — Exception — Amendment to extend or delete period of duration. [Repealed.]

271B.14-225.
Permissibility of merger of subsequent reincorporation with reinstated prior corporation — Effect.

The General Assembly finds and declares it to be the public policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that each corporation which was refused reinstatement either orally or in writing and subsequently reincorporated as a second corporation may reinstate the first corporation and merge the second corporation into the first corporation. The first corporation shall then be treated as if it had continuous and uninterrupted existence and that the administrative dissolution or revocation had never occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 161, § 3, effective April 1, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Montague and Muehlenkamp, Kentucky Corporate Law Developments, 21 N. Ky. L. Rev. 413 (1994).

271B.14-230.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement. [Repealed.]